test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-pohted_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - pohteđ: # ML checked

    pohteđ+V+Inf: pohteđ
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: pohtuđ
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pohtuum
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pohtuuh
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pohtoo
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pohtojeen
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pohtuuvettee
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pohtuv
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pohtup
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pohtuuvetteđ
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pohtojeh
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pohtojim
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pohtojih
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pohtui
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: pohtuim
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: pohtuid
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: pohtuin
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pohtuim
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pohtuid
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pohtojii

    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: povtuččim
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: povtuččih
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: povtuččij
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: povtuččáim
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: povtuččáid
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: povtuččáin
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: povtuččijm
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: povtuččijd
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: povtuččii
    
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: povtužeem
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: povtužeeh
##    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: poovtuš
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: povtužeen
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: poovtušvettee
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: povtužává
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: povtužep
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: poovtušvetteđ
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: povtužeh

    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pohtuu
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pohtum
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: pohtuuččii
#    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pohtuužii
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [pohtojeijee, pohtojijjee]
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [pohtum, poohtum] #Lene added poohtum
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: pohtum
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: pohtuumin
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: pohtuumist
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: pohtuumân
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: pohtuudijn
    pohteđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: pohtuuhánnáá
    
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povtedâm
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: povtedah
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poovted
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: povtedeen
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: poovtedvettee
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: povtedává
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: povtedeh

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: poovted

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: povtedim
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: povtedij
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: povtedii

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: povtediččim
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: povtedičij

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: povtedižžeem
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: povtediš
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: poovted
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: povtedâm
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: povtedižžii
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: povtedâm

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: poovtedhánnáá

    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: povtedem
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: poovtedmân
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: poovtedmin
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: poovtedmist
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: poovteddijn
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: poovteddijnân
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: poovteddijnâd
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: poovteddijnis
    pohteđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: poovteddijn
    pohteđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povtestâm
    pohteđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povtettâm
    pohteđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: povteškuáđám


  Verb - toideđ: # ML checked; this is not in the same contlex with pohteđ

    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: toideliđ
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toidelâm
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toidel
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: toideleen
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: toideleh
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: toidel
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: toidelim
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toidelij
    toideđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: toidelii
